West Virginia, session 2026, HB4323.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of Commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Economic Development. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on October 8, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5B-1-9 of this code, relating to the Division of Economic Development (Tourism Development Districts, 145 CSR 16), is authorized.